Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Towing and storage of motor vehicles

281.920.
Definitions for KRS 281.920 to 281.936.

As used in KRS

281.920

to

281.936

:

“Lienholder” means a person, including a secured party, with a lien indicated on a certificate of title issued by any state;

“Motor vehicle renting company” has the same meaning as in KRS

281.687

; and

“Owner” when referring to a motor vehicle, means:

The person or entity to whom a motor vehicle is registered;

The person to whom a motor vehicle is leased, if the terms of the lease require the lessee to maintain and repair the vehicle; or

A motor vehicle rental company, if the vehicle was rented pursuant to a rental agreement.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

281.922.
Emergency towing — Duties of towing company.

This section applies to any towing company that engages in, or offers to engage in, emergency towing.

Prior to the removal of a towed motor vehicle from a tow truck, a towing company that engages in emergency towing shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation to document evidence of any vehicle damage, debris, or damaged cargo or property.

A towing company operating under this section may document, at the scene, any complications to the recovery process in writing or by using any of the methods outlined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if:

Law enforcement does not object; and

It can be performed in a safe manner.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a towing company, while providing an emergency tow, shall not stop, or cause a person to stop, at the scene of an accident or near a disabled motor vehicle, for the purpose of:

Soliciting an engagement for emergency towing services;

Moving a motor vehicle from a public street, road, or highway; or

Accruing charges in connection with paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.

A towing company may stop, or cause a person to stop, at the scene of an accident or near a disabled motor vehicle under the circumstances of subsection (3) of this section if the:

Towing company is requested to stop or to perform a towing service by a law enforcement officer;

Towing company is summoned to the scene or requested to stop by the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle;

Owner of a disabled motor vehicle has provided consent to the towing company to stop or perform a towing service; or

Towing company has reasonable belief that a motorist is in need of immediate aid. A towing company shall not offer towing services under this paragraph unless a condition of paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection has been met.

Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle, in consultation with law enforcement or with authorized state or local government personnel, may:

Summon to the disabled motor vehicle’s location the towing company of the owner’s or operator’s choice, either directly or through an insurance company’s or an automobile club’s emergency service arrangement; and

Designate the location to which the disabled motor vehicle is to be towed.

If the location designated by the owner or operator is not a storage facility owned or operated by the towing company, the owner or operator shall arrange for payment to the towing company at the time the towing company is summoned.

Subsection (5) of this section shall not apply:

In the event of a declared emergency; or

If the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle:

Is incapacitated or otherwise unable to summon a towing company; or

Defers to law enforcement or to authorized state or local government personnel as to the towing company to be summoned or the location to which the disabled motor vehicle is to be towed.

The authority of an owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle to summon the towing company of the owner’s or operator’s choice under subsection (5) of this section shall be superseded by a law enforcement officer or by authorized state or local government personnel if:

The towing company the owner or operator chooses is unable to respond to the location of the disabled motor vehicle in a timely fashion; or

The disabled motor vehicle is a hazard, impedes the flow of traffic, or may not legally remain in the motor vehicle’s location in the opinion of the law enforcement officer or authorized state or local government official.

If a disabled motor vehicle is causing or poses a safety hazard, the towing company may move the disabled motor vehicle to a safe location after being authorized by a law enforcement officer or by authorized state or local government personnel. The owner of the disabled vehicle shall be responsible for the costs of the tow.

A disabled vehicle shall not be removed from a scene that is under the control of a law enforcement agency without authorization from the law enforcement agency.

If a towing company is summoned for emergency towing by the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle, the towing company shall make a record, to the extent available, consisting of:

The first and last name and telephone number of the individual who summoned the towing company to the scene; and

The color, make, model, year, vehicle identification number, and license plate number of the disabled motor vehicle.

If a towing company is summoned for emergency towing by a law enforcement officer or by authorized state or local government personnel, the towing company shall make a record, to the extent available, consisting of:

The identity of the law enforcement agency or authorized state, county, or municipal agency requesting the emergency towing; and

The color, make, model, year, vehicle identification number, and license plate number of the disabled motor vehicle.

A towing company shall maintain a record created under subsection (10) or (11) of this section and provide the record to a law enforcement agency upon request from the time the towing company appears at the location of the disabled motor vehicle until the time the motor vehicle is towed and released to an authorized third party. A towing company shall retain the record created under subsection (10) or (11) of this section for a period of two (2) years from the date the disabled motor vehicle was towed and, throughout the two (2) year period, make the record available for inspection and copying, not later than forty-eight (48) hours after receiving a written request from a law enforcement agency, the Attorney General, the disabled motor vehicle’s owner, or an authorized agent of the disabled motor vehicle’s owner. If the disabled motor vehicle was involved in a collision, the records shall be available for inspection by any individual involved in the underlying collision, his or her respective insurance companies, or his or her legal representatives. Records maintained under this subsection shall be kept in paper or electronic form.

A towing company that performs emergency towing under this section shall, upon taking possession of the motor vehicle, secure a towed motor vehicle properly and take all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, including weather damage, or theft of a towed motor vehicle, including the motor vehicle’s cargo and contents until the motor vehicle is out of the towing company’s possession. A towing company shall not be responsible for damage that occurred prior to taking possession of the motor vehicle for towing.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

281.924.
Private property towing — Signage required for tow-away zone — Duties of towing company.

This section applies to any towing company that engages in, or offers to engage in, private property towing.

This section does not apply to the towing of a motor vehicle from a tow- away zone that is not located on private property.

Prior to removing a motor vehicle from a tow truck under this section, a towing company that engages in or offers to engage in private property towing shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation to document evidence of any vehicle damage, debris, or damaged cargo or property, or complications to the recovery process.

A private property owner may establish a tow-away zone on the owner’s property. A property owner that establishes a tow-away zone under this subsection shall post at the location of the tow-away zone a sign that is clearly visible to the public. The sign shall include a statement that the area is a tow-away zone, pertinent contact information, and a description of any persons authorized to park or prohibited from parking in the area.

A towing company that tows a motor vehicle under this section shall ensure that the motor vehicle is towed to a storage facility located within twenty-five (25) miles of the location of the tow-away zone from which the motor vehicle was removed or, if no storage facility is located within twenty-five (25) miles of the location of the tow-away zone, to the storage facility nearest to the tow-away zone.

If the owner or operator of a motor vehicle parked in violation of a tow-away zone arrives at the location of the tow-away zone or private property while the motor vehicle is being towed, the towing company shall give the owner or operator either oral or written notification that the owner or operator may pay a fee in an amount not greater than fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the fee the towing company normally charges for the release of a motor vehicle. Upon the owner’s or operator’s payment of the amount specified, the towing company shall release the motor vehicle to the owner or operator and give the owner or operator a receipt showing the full amount of the fee the towing company normally charges for the release of a motor vehicle and the amount of the fee paid by the owner or operator.

A towing company shall provide notice to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the location of the private property not later than two (2) hours after completing a tow of a motor vehicle from private property.

A towing company that performs private property towing shall secure a towed motor vehicle properly and take all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, including weather damage, or theft of a towed motor vehicle, including the motor vehicle’s cargo and contents until the motor vehicle is out of the towing company’s possession. A towing company shall not be responsible for damage that occurred prior to taking possession of the motor vehicle for towing.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

281.926.
Rates for emergency towing services to be posted and provided upon request — Itemized invoices required — Retention and inspection of records.

This section applies to any towing company that engages in, or offers to engage in, emergency towing.

Prior to attaching a motor vehicle to the tow truck, the towing company shall furnish the vehicle’s owner or operator, if the owner or operator is present at the scene of the disabled vehicle and upon the owner’s or operator’s request, a rate sheet listing all rates for towing services, including but not limited to all rates for towing and associated fees, cleanup, labor, storage, and any other services provided by the towing company.

Any towing company or storage facility shall post a rate sheet at its place of business and shall make the rate sheet available upon a customer’s request.

Any charge in excess of the rate sheets provided under this subsection shall be deemed excessive.

An itemized invoice of actual towing charges assessed by a towing company for a completed tow shall be made available to the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner’s agent no later than one (1) business day after:

The tow is completed; or

The towing company has obtained all necessary information to be included on the invoice, including any charges submitted by subcontractors used by the towing company to complete the tow and recovery.

The itemized invoice required under subsection (4) of this section shall contain the following information:

The date and time the motor vehicle was towed;

The location to which the motor vehicle was towed;

The name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;

A description of the towed motor vehicle, including the color, make, model, year, and vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle;

The license plate number and state of registration for the towed motor vehicle;

The cost of the original towing service;

The cost of any vehicle storage fees, expressed as a daily rate;

Other fees, including documentation fees and motor vehicle search fees; and

A list of the services that were performed under a warranty or that were otherwise performed at no cost to the owner of the motor vehicle.

Any service or fee in addition to the services or fees described in subsection (5)(f), (g), or (h) of this section shall be set forth individually as a single line item on the invoice required by this section, with an explanation and the exact charge for the service or the exact amount of the fee.

A copy of each invoice and receipt submitted by a tow truck operator in accordance with this section shall:

Be retained by the towing company for a period of two (2) years from the date of issuance; and

Throughout the two (2) year period described in this subsection, be made available for inspection and copying not later than forty-eight (48) hours after receiving a written request for inspection from:

A law enforcement agency;

The Attorney General;

A city attorney, county attorney, or the prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction in the location of any of the towing company’s business locations;

The disabled motor vehicle’s owner or lienholder;

An agent of the disabled motor vehicle’s owner or lienholder; or

Any individual involved in the underlying collision, his or her respective insurance companies, or his or her legal representatives, if the disabled motor vehicle was involved in a collision.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

281.928.
Required notice to owner and lienholder — Contents — Holding and retrieval period for towed vehicles.

Within one (1) business day of the removal, a towing company shall contact the cabinet in order to ascertain the identity of the owner and any lienholder of any motor vehicle registered in Kentucky which it has towed and, within ten (10) days of the removal, shall, by certified mail, provide notice to the owner and any lienholder at the address or addresses of record, when a motor vehicle has been:

Towed under KRS

281.924

or

281.926

;

Involuntarily towed or transported pursuant to order of police, other public authority, or private person or business for any reason;

Stolen or misappropriated and its removal from the public ways has been ordered by police, other public authority, or by private person or business; or

In any other situation, involuntarily towed or transported by order of police, other authority, or by private person or business. If the lienholder is a registered organization listed in the business records of the Secretary of State, the cabinet shall provide the address listed for the lienholder.

The cabinet shall, within two (2) business days, provide the towing company the name and address of the owner and lienholder of any motor vehicle requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

If a vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section is placed in a garage or other storage facility, the owner of the facility shall provide the notice required in subsection (1) of this section, by certified mail, to the owner and any lienholder at the address or addresses of record of the motor vehicle within ten (10) days of recovery of, or taking possession of, the motor vehicle.

Any notice sent under this subsection shall comply with the notification provisions of subsection (4) of this section and shall include an estimated itemized invoice pursuant to KRS 281.926(5) that specifies the amount of charges for towing, recovery, storage, transporting, and other applicable charges due on the vehicle.

If the owner of the storage facility fails to provide notice as provided in this section, the motor vehicle storage facility shall forfeit all storage fees accrued after ten (10) days from the date of tow.

This subsection shall not apply to a garage or storage facility owned or operated by a government entity.

Any notification required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall include:

The date and time the vehicle was towed;

The location from which the vehicle was towed;

The name, address, and telephone number where the vehicle will be located;

The location, address, and phone number where payment and business transactions take place if different from the business address;

The name, address, and phone number of the towing company or storage facility;

A description of the towed vehicle which shall at a minimum include the make, model, year, vehicle identification number, and color of the towed vehicle;

The license plate number and state of registration of the towed vehicle; and

A copy of the rate sheet required in KRS 281.926(2), if the vehicle was towed by a towing company operating under this chapter and vehicles are being held in a storage facility or garage.

If a vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section is determined to be a corporately owned motor vehicle, the notices required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be sent to the corporate address listed on the registration. A motor vehicle under this subsection shall be held for up to forty-five (45) days to allow the motor vehicle owner or lienholder to retrieve the towed motor vehicle. The rate charged shall be the standard daily rate of the towing company or storage facility. If at any time more than one (1) motor vehicle owned by the same corporation is under the control of a towing company or storage facility, each motor vehicle shall be processed under a separate transaction.

A towing company or storage facility that has met the provisions of this section may sell the towed vehicle in accordance with KRS

359.230

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

281.930.
Payment and release requirements for towed vehicles.

This section applies to towing companies that tow and store motor vehicles, and to storage facilities that store vehicles towed by a towing company, regardless of whether the towing company and the storage facilities are affiliates.

Upon payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle towed and stored under this chapter, the towing company or storage facility shall release the motor vehicle to:

A properly identified owner or lienholder of the motor vehicle; or

An authorized representative of the insurance company or its contracted service provider insuring the motor vehicle if the:

Motor vehicle is covered by an active policy of insurance and the insurance representative provides proof of coverage; or

Owner of the motor vehicle approves release of the vehicle to the insurance company representative.

Prior to payment of fees and release of the motor vehicle, a storage facility or towing company shall not refuse the right of physical inspection of the towed vehicle during posted business hours by:

An owner;

A lienholder;

A representative of the insurance company that insures the motor vehicle; or

A contracted service provider of the insurance company.

The inspection of a vehicle that is being held as evidence by a law enforcement agency shall only occur if authorized by the investigating law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency may impose any or all of the following restrictions:

Restrict the inspection to visual and touchless only; or

Require any persons or entities outlined in paragraph (a) of this subsection to be accompanied by a law enforcement officer.

A towing company or storage facility shall accept payment made by any of the following means from an individual seeking to release a motor vehicle:

Cash;

Check from an insurer or its agent;

Credit card;

Debit card;

Money order; or

Check drawn by a bank or other financial institution.

Upon receiving payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle, a towing company or storage facility shall provide to the person making payment an itemized receipt in accordance with KRS 281.926(4) and (5) to the extent the information is known or available.

A towing company or storage facility shall be open for business or accessible by telephone during posted business hours. A towing company or storage facility shall provide a telephone number available on a twenty-four (24) hour basis to receive calls and messages from callers, including calls made outside posted business hours. All calls made to a towing company or storage facility shall be returned within twenty-four (24) hours from the time received. However, if adverse weather, an emergency situation, or another act over which the towing company or storage facility has no control prevents the towing company or storage facility from returning calls within twenty-four (24) hours, the towing company or storage facility shall return all calls received as quickly as possible.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

281.932.
Prohibited fees — Retention and inspection of records.

A towing company or storage facility shall not charge a fee for towing, cleanup services, storage of a motor vehicle, or a combination thereof that is in excess of the rate sheets required in KRS

281.926

.

All services rendered by a towing company or storage facility, including warranty or no-cost services, shall be recorded on an invoice. The storage facility, towing company, or the owner or operator of a tow truck, shall maintain the records for two (2) years, including rate sheets, and shall make the records available for inspection and copying upon written request from law enforcement or the cabinet. Records maintained under this section shall be kept in paper or electronic form.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

281.934.
Prohibited acts by towing company or storage facility.

A towing company shall not:

Falsely represent that the towing company represents or is approved by any law enforcement agency, or any organization that provides emergency road service for disabled motor vehicles;

Require an owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle to preauthorize more than twenty-four (24) hours of storage or repair work as a condition to providing towing service for the disabled vehicle;

Charge more than one (1) towing fee when the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle requests transport of the motor vehicle to a repair facility owned or operated by the towing company; or

Tow a motor vehicle to a repair facility, unless the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner’s designated representative gives consent and the consent is given prior to the removal of the motor vehicle from the location from which the motor vehicle is to be towed. This paragraph shall not apply to a storage facility that has a repair facility on the same site so long as the motor vehicle is not moved into the repair facility without consent.

A towing company or storage facility shall not:

Upon payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle towed and stored under this chapter, refuse to release the motor vehicle to a properly identified owner or lienholder of the motor vehicle or to an authorized representative of the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle or the insurance company’s contracted provider, if the motor vehicle is covered by an active policy of insurance. Motor vehicle release under this paragraph shall not apply to any case in which a law enforcement agency has ordered the motor vehicle not to be released or in any case in which a judicial order prohibits its release;

Refuse to permit a properly identified owner or lienholder of a motor vehicle or a representative of the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle is covered by an active policy of insurance to inspect the motor vehicle during posted business hours before all costs incurred against the motor vehicle are paid or the motor vehicle is released; or

Charge a storage fee for a stored motor vehicle with respect to any day on which release of the motor vehicle or inspection of the motor vehicle by the owner, lienholder, or insurance company is not permitted during posted business hours by the towing company or storage facility.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

281.936.
Cabinet not liable under KRS 281.920 to 281.936.

The cabinet shall be held harmless for any mistakes, errors, delays, or property damage to any motor vehicle in relation to the towing or storage of a vehicle under KRS

281.920

to

281.936

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 74, § 10, effective June 29, 2021.